Utah statutes.
31A-43-301.   Stop-loss insurance coverage standards.

(1)  A small employer stop-loss insurance contract shall:

(a)  be issued to the small employer to provide insurance to the group health benefit plan, not the employees of the small employer;

(b)  use a standard application form developed by the commissioner by administrative rule;

(c)  have a contract term with guaranteed rates for at least 12 months, without adjustment, unless there is a change in the benefits provided under the small employer's health plan during the contract period;

(d)  include both a specific attachment point and an aggregate attachment point in a contract;

(e)  align stop-loss plan benefit limitations and exclusions with a small employer's health plan benefit limitations and exclusions, including any annual or lifetime limits in the employer's health plan;

(f)  have an annual specific attachment point that is at least $10,000;

(g)  have an annual aggregate attachment point that may not be less than 90% of expected claims;

(h)  pay stop-loss claims:

(i)  incurred during the contract period; and

(ii)  submitted within 12 months after the expiration date of the contract; and

(i)  include provisions to cover incurred and unpaid claims if a small employer plan terminates.

(2)  A small employer stop-loss contract shall not:

(a)  include lasering; and

(b)  pay claims directly to an individual employee, member, or participant.



Enacted by Chapter 341, 2013 General Session

